District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.18

Repealed

Shares — Determination of amount of stated capital.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 188, ch. 269, § 18
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(h), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-908e.
1981 Ed., § 29-318.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.18.